North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-15 Temporary Roadblocks

24-15-01.
Definition.

For the purpose of this chapter, a temporary roadblock means any structure, device, or means used by police, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, game wardens, highway patrolmen, agents of the federal bureau of investigation, or officers of the United States border patrol, for the purpose of controlling traffic through a point on a highway, road, or street, whereby all vehicles may be slowed or stopped.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 284, § 1.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see § 1-01-09.

24-15-02.
Authority to establish roadblocks.

The duly authorized law enforcement officers are hereby authorized to establish in their respective jurisdictions, or in other jurisdictions within the state, temporary roadblocks upon the highways, roads, and streets of this state for the purpose of apprehending persons wanted for violation of the laws of this state, or of any other state, or of the United States of America, and using the highways, roads, or streets of this state for the purpose of escape.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 284, § 2.

Collateral References.

Validity of routine roadblocks by state or local police for purpose of discovery of vehicular or driving violation, 37 A.L.R.4th 10.

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of alcoholic intoxication — post-Sitz cases, 74 A.L.R.5th 319.

Validity of police roadblocks or checkpoints for purpose of discovery of illegal narcotics violations, 82 A.L.R.5th 103.

24-15-03.
Minimum requirements.

For the purpose of warning and protecting the traveling public, the minimum requirements to be met by such officers establishing temporary roadblocks are:

The temporary roadblock must be established at a point on the highway clearly visible at a distance of not less than three hundred feet [91.44 meters] in either direction.

At a point of the temporary roadblock, at least one red light must be placed at the point of the temporary roadblock which must display an intermittent or flashing beam of light, clearly visible to the oncoming traffic at a distance of not less than three hundred feet [91.44 meters] under normal atmospheric conditions. The intermittent or flashing beam of light may be provided by lighting which is part of the equipment of a class A authorized emergency vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 284, § 3; 1983, ch. 310, § 1.

24-15-04.
Existing law preserved.

Nothing in this chapter may be deemed to limit or encroach upon the existing authority of North Dakota law enforcement officers in the performance of their duties involving traffic control and criminal apprehension.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 284, § 4.

24-15-05.
Penalty.

Any person who proceeds or travels through a roadblock without submitting to the traffic control so established is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 284, § 5; 1975, ch. 106, § 265.